Alabama, session 2026rs, HB534.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) There is levied in Mobile County a
privilege tax of eight percent of the net gambling revenue
collected from pari-mutuel wagering on historical horse racing
on computerized machines of a historical horse racing licensee
of the Mobile County Racing Commission. The tax shall be
collected by the Mobile County Racing Commission from each
historical horse racing licensee and distributed as provided
by local law.
(b) For purposes of subsection (a), "net gambling
revenue" means the total amount of money or value in any form
received as a result of any pari-mutuel wagering on historical
horse racing activities in Mobile County, excluding free bets,
free lays, and promotional credits, less federal excise taxes,
voided wagers, and the total money or value in any form paid
as prizes or winnings.
(c) the local privilege tax collected by the Mobile
Page 1

(c) the local privilege tax collected by the Mobile
HB534 INTRODUCED
County Racing Commission under this section is exclusive of
and supersedes any other local taxes, fees, or commissions now
imposed on historical horse racing pari-mutuel activities in
the county, including, but not limited to, the tax imposed
pursuant to Section 45-49-151.14, Code of Alabama 1975.
(d) Nothing in this section shall change the existing
tax structure contained in section 45-49-151.14, Code of
Alabama 1975, for live greyhound racing, as well as simulcast
live greyhound and thoroughbred racing in Mobile County, which
is not historical horse racing.
(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
authorize, permit, or expand any form of gambling activity
beyond that which is permitted by law on the effective date of
this act.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2